Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.175.105

Statewide dropout reengagement program—Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 28A.175.100 through 28A.175.110 unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(1) "Dropout reengagement program" means an educational program that offers at least the following instruction and services:

(a) Academic instruction, including but not limited to preparation to earn a high school equivalency certificate as provided in RCW 28B.50.536 in accordance with rules adopted under RCW 28A.305.190, academic skills instruction, and college and work readiness preparation, that generates credits that can be applied to a high school diploma from the student's school district or from a community or technical college under RCW 28B.50.535 and has the goal of enabling the student to obtain the academic and work readiness skills necessary for employment or postsecondary study. A dropout reengagement program is not required to offer instruction in only those subject areas where a student is deficient in accumulated credits. Academic instruction must be provided by teachers certified by the Washington professional educator standards board or by instructors employed by a community or technical college whose required credentials are established by the college;

(b) Case management, academic and career counseling, and assistance with accessing services and resources that support at-risk youth and reduce barriers to educational success; and

(c) If the program provider is a community or technical college, the opportunity for qualified students to enroll in college courses that lead to a postsecondary degree or certificate. The college may not charge an eligible student tuition for such enrollment.

(2) "Eligible student" means a student who:

(a) Is at least sixteen but less than twenty-one years of age at the beginning of the school year;

(b) Is not accumulating sufficient credits toward a high school diploma to reasonably complete a high school diploma from a public school before the age of twenty-one or is recommended for the program by case managers from the department of social and health services or the juvenile justice system; and

(c) Is enrolled or enrolls in the school district in which the student resides, or is enrolled or enrolls in an institutional education program as defined in RCW 28A.190.005 or a nonresident school district under RCW 28A.225.220 through 28A.225.230.

(3) "Full-time equivalent eligible student" means an eligible student whose enrollment and attendance meet criteria adopted by the office of the superintendent of public instruction specifically for dropout reengagement programs. The criteria shall be:

(a) Based on the community or technical college credits generated by the student if the program provider is a community or technical college; and

(b) Based on a minimum amount of planned programming or instruction and minimum attendance by the student rather than hours of seat time if the program provider is a community-based organization.

[ 2021 c 164 s 7; 2013 c 39 s 5; 2010 c 20 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2021 c 164: See note following RCW 28A.190.005.

Intent—2010 c 20: See note following RCW 28A.175.100.